Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 2. The University of Virginia’s College at Wise.

§ 23.1-2211.
The University of Virginia’s College at Wise.

The University of Virginia’s College at Wise (the College), established in Wise County, Virginia, is a division of the University and a baccalaureate public institution of higher education subject to the supervision, management, and control of the board.

Direct and indirect appropriations from the Commonwealth to the College shall be expended as directed by the board.

All property, property rights, duties, contracts, and agreements of the College are vested in the board. The board shall care for and preserve all property belonging to the College.

With respect to the College, the board has all the powers that are vested in the board with respect to the University.

The president of the University shall be the principal administrative officer of the College.

The board shall fix the title of the chief executive officer of the College.

History.

1966, c. 68, §§ 23-91.20, 23-91.21, 23-91.22; 1999, cc. 424, 437; 2016, c. 588.